District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.137

Procedures for appeal.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 234, ch. 269, § 137
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 163(b), 168(c)(3)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.137.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.38.
1973 Ed., § 29-948.